closure.aff
SFX N_n       0   pista     [aeiou]p
SFX N_n       0   tista     [aeiou]t
SFX N_n      y     ista
SFX N_n      o     ista      [^cgi]o
SFX N_n      o    hista        [cg]o
SFX N_n     io     ista
SFX N_n      a     ista      [^cgi]a
SFX N_n      a    hista        [cg]a
SFX N_n     ia     ista
SFX N_n      e     ista        [^i]e
SFX N_n     ie     ista
SFX N_n      i     ista
SFX N_n    aco     ista    [^cgi]aco
SFX N_n   iaco     ista
SFX N_n    aca     ista    [^cgi]aca
SFX N_n   iaca     ista
SFX N_n    ico     ista
SFX N_n    ica     ista
SFX N_n    isi     ista
SFX N_n   ismo     ista
SFX N_n       0    iano  [^aeioucgy]
SFX N_n       0   hiano         [cg]
SFX N_n       0  chiano     [aeiou]c
SFX N_n       0  ghiano     [aeiou]g
SFX N_n       0   piano     [aeiou]p
SFX N_n       0   tiano     [aeiou]t
SFX N_n      y     iano
SFX N_n      o     iano      [^cgi]o
SFX N_n      o    hiano        [cg]o
SFX N_n     io     iano
SFX N_n      a     iano      [^cgi]a
SFX N_n      a    hiano        [cg]a
SFX N_n     ia     iano
SFX N_n      e     iano        [^i]e
SFX N_n     ie     iano
SFX N_n      i     iano
SFX N_n       0    iana  [^aeioucgy]
SFX N_n       0   hiana         [cg]
SFX N_n       0  chiana     [aeiou]c
SFX N_n       0  ghiana     [aeiou]g
SFX N_n       0   piana     [aeiou]p
SFX N_n       0   tiana     [aeiou]t
SFX N_n      y     iana
SFX N_n      o     iana      [^cgi]o
SFX N_n      o    hiana        [cg]o
SFX N_n     io     iana
SFX N_n      a     iana      [^cgi]a
SFX N_n      a    hiana        [cg]a
SFX N_n     ia     iana
SFX N_n      e     iana        [^i]e
SFX N_n     ie     iana
SFX N_n      i     iana
SFX N_n       0     ese  [^aeioucgy]
SFX N_n       0    hese         [cg]
SFX N_n       0   chese     [aeiou]c
SFX N_n       0   ghese     [aeiou]g
SFX N_n       0    pese     [aeiou]p
SFX N_n       0    tese     [aeiou]t
SFX N_n      y     iese
SFX N_n      o      ese       [^cg]o
SFX N_n      o     hese        [cg]o
SFX N_n     io      ese       [cg]io
SFX N_n      a      ese       [^cg]a
SFX N_n      a     hese        [cg]a
SFX N_n     ia      ese       [cg]ia
SFX N_n      e      ese
SFX N_n      i      ese
SFX N_n       0   aggio    [^aeiouy]
SFX N_n       0  caggio     [aeiou]c
SFX N_n       0  gaggio     [aeiou]g
SFX N_n       0  paggio     [aeiou]p
SFX N_n       0  taggio     [aeiou]t
SFX N_n      y   iaggio
SFX N_n   ione      ura     [^z]ione
SFX N_n  zione     tura
SFX N_n  zione    ttura [aeiou]zione
SFX N_n      o    atore
SFX N_n      a    atore
SFX N_n      e    atore      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e   iatore        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i    atore      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i   iatore        [cg]i
SFX N_n   ione      ore     [^z]ione
SFX N_n  zione     tore
SFX N_n  zione    ttore [aeiou]zione
SFX N_n      o    atora
SFX N_n      a    atora
SFX N_n      e    atora      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e   iatora        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i    atora      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i   iatora        [cg]i
SFX N_n   ione      ora     [^z]ione
SFX N_n  zione     tora
SFX N_n  zione    ttora [aeiou]zione
SFX N_n      o   atrice
SFX N_n      a   atrice
SFX N_n      e   atrice      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e  iatrice        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i   atrice      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i  iatrice        [cg]i
SFX N_n  tione    trice
SFX N_n  zione    trice
SFX N_n  zione   ttrice [aeiou]zione
SFX N_n      e       ia         tore
SFX N_n      a       ia         tora
SFX N_n   rice     oria        trice
SFX N_n      o     eria       [^cg]o
SFX N_n      o    heria        [cg]o
SFX N_n     io     eria       [cg]io
SFX N_n      a     eria       [^cg]a
SFX N_n      a    heria        [cg]a
SFX N_n     ia     eria       [cg]ia
SFX N_n      e     eria
SFX N_n      i     eria
SFX N_n    aio     eria    [^cgi]aio
SFX N_n    aio    heria      [cg]aio
SFX N_n   iaio     eria     [cg]iaio
SFX N_n    aia     eria    [^cgi]aia
SFX N_n    aia    heria      [cg]aia
SFX N_n   iaia     eria     [cg]iaia
SFX N_n   iere     eria [^aeoul]iere
SFX N_n   iere     eria    [^g]liere
SFX N_n    ere     eria       gliere
SFX N_n    ere     eria   [aeou]iere
SFX N_n   ione      oio     [^z]ione
SFX N_n  zione     toio
SFX N_n  zione    ttoio [aeiou]zione
SFX N_n   ione      oia     [^z]ione
SFX N_n  zione     toia
SFX N_n  zione    ttoia [aeiou]zione
SFX N_n      o   ificio      [^cgi]o
SFX N_n      o  hificio        [cg]o
SFX N_n     io   ificio
SFX N_n      a   ificio      [^cgi]a
SFX N_n      a  hificio        [cg]a
SFX N_n     ia   ificio
SFX N_n      e   ificio        [^i]e
SFX N_n     ie   ificio
SFX N_n      i   ificio
SFX N_n      o      ato
SFX N_n      a      ato
SFX N_n      e      ato      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e     iato        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i      ato      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i     iato        [cg]i
SFX N_n       0     ata    [^aeiouy]
SFX N_n       0    cata     [aeiou]c
SFX N_n       0    gata     [aeiou]g
SFX N_n       0    pata     [aeiou]p
SFX N_n       0    tata     [aeiou]t
SFX N_n      y     iata
SFX N_n      o      ata
SFX N_n      a      ata
SFX N_n      e      ata      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e     iata        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i      ata      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i     iata        [cg]i
SFX N_n      o      ame
SFX N_n      a      ame
SFX N_n      e      ame      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e     iame        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i      ame      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i     iame        [cg]i
SFX N_n      o      ume
SFX N_n      a      ume
SFX N_n      e      ume      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e     iume        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i      ume      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i     iume        [cg]i
SFX N_n      o    aglia
SFX N_n      a    aglia
SFX N_n      e    aglia      [^cgh]e
SFX N_n      e   iaglia        [cg]e
SFX N_n      i    aglia      [^cgh]i
SFX N_n      i   iaglia        [cg]i
SFX N_n     o    istica      [^cgi]o
SFX N_n     o   histica        [cg]o
SFX N_n    io    istica
SFX N_n     a    istica      [^cgi]a
SFX N_n     a   histica        [cg]a
SFX N_n    ia    istica
SFX N_n     e    istica        [^i]e
SFX N_n    ie    istica
SFX N_n     i    istica
SFX N_n     o       ite      [^cgi]o
SFX N_n     o      hite        [cg]o
SFX N_n    io       ite
SFX N_n     a       ite      [^cgi]a
SFX N_n     a      hite        [cg]a
SFX N_n    ia       ite
SFX N_n     e       ite        [^i]e
SFX N_n    ie       ite
SFX N_n     i       ite
SFX N_aj     e         ale         ione
SFX N_aj     a         ale          ura
SFX N_aj     e         ale          ore
SFX N_aj     e        iale          ore
SFX N_aj     a         ale          ora
SFX N_aj     a        iale          ora
SFX N_aj     o         ale        mento
SFX N_aj     o         ale         orio
SFX N_aj     a         ale         oria
SFX N_aj     e         ale         oide
SFX N_aj     o         ale          ico
SFX N_aj     a         ale          ica
SFX N_aj     o        iale           za
SFX N_aj     a        iale           za
SFX N_aj     o        uale [lnrst][st]o
SFX N_aj     a        uale [lnrst][st]a
SFX N_aj     e         are           le
SFX N_aj     e         are       l[^l]e
SFX N_aj     a         are           la
SFX N_aj     a         are       l[^l]a
SFX N_aj     a         are   l[^l][ei]a
SFX N_aj     o         are           lo
SFX N_aj     o         are       l[^l]o
SFX N_aj     o         are   l[^l][ei]o
SFX N_aj     o         are        mento
SFX N_aj     e        iare         bile
SFX N_aj     à        ario          ità
SFX N_aj     o        ario        mento
SFX N_aj     a       iario           za
SFX N_aj      0        ico  [^aeioucgy]
SFX N_aj      0       hico         [cg]
SFX N_aj      0      chico     [aeiou]c
SFX N_aj      0      ghico     [aeiou]g
SFX N_aj      0       pico     [aeiou]p
SFX N_aj      0       tico     [aeiou]t
SFX N_aj     y         ico
SFX N_aj     o         ico      [^cgi]o
SFX N_aj     o        hico        [cg]o
SFX N_aj    io         ico
SFX N_aj     a         ico      [^cgi]a
SFX N_aj     a        hico        [cg]a
SFX N_aj    ia         ico
SFX N_aj     e         ico        [^i]e
SFX N_aj    ie         ico
SFX N_aj     i         ico
SFX N_aj    si        tico       [^s]si
SFX N_aj   ssi       ttico
SFX N_aj   sia        tico      [^s]sia
SFX N_aj  ssia       ttico
SFX N_aj   zia        tico      [^z]zia
SFX N_aj     a       atico           ma
SFX N_aj     a      astico
SFX N_aj      0     istico  [^aeioucgy]
SFX N_aj      0    histico         [cg]
SFX N_aj      0   chistico     [aeiou]c
SFX N_aj      0   ghistico     [aeiou]g
SFX N_aj      0    pistico     [aeiou]p
SFX N_aj      0    tistico     [aeiou]t
SFX N_aj     y      istico
SFX N_aj     o      istico      [^cgi]o
SFX N_aj     o     histico        [cg]o
SFX N_aj    io      istico
SFX N_aj     a      istico      [^cgi]a
SFX N_aj     a     histico        [cg]a
SFX N_aj    ia      istico
SFX N_aj     e      istico        [^i]e
SFX N_aj    ie      istico
SFX N_aj     i      istico
SFX N_aj   smo       stico      [ai]smo
SFX N_aj   sta       stico      [ai]sta
SFX N_aj  ione         ivo     [^z]ione
SFX N_aj zione        tivo
SFX N_aj zione       ttivo [aeiou]zione
SFX N_aj  ione        orio     [^z]ione
SFX N_aj zione       torio
SFX N_aj zione      ttorio [aeiou]zione
SFX N_aj     e          io          ore
SFX N_aj  iere        iero
SFX N_aj     e        izio          ale
SFX N_aj     o        izio          ato
SFX N_aj     e          eo          ide
SFX N_aj      0       esco  [^aeioucgy]
SFX N_aj      0      hesco         [cg]
SFX N_aj      0     chesco     [aeiou]c
SFX N_aj      0     ghesco     [aeiou]g
SFX N_aj      0      pesco     [aeiou]p
SFX N_aj      0      tesco     [aeiou]t
SFX N_aj     y       iesco
SFX N_aj     o        esco       [^cg]o
SFX N_aj     o       hesco        [cg]o
SFX N_aj    io        esco       [cg]io
SFX N_aj     a        esco       [^cg]a
SFX N_aj     a       hesco        [cg]a
SFX N_aj    ia        esco       [cg]ia
SFX N_aj     e        esco
SFX N_aj     i        esco
SFX N_aj     o        aceo
SFX N_aj     a        aceo
SFX N_aj     e        aceo      [^cgh]e
SFX N_aj     e       iaceo        [cg]e
SFX N_aj     i        aceo      [^cgh]i
SFX N_aj     i       iaceo        [cg]i
SFX N_aj   oso        aceo
SFX N_aj     o        igno      [^cgi]o
SFX N_aj     o       higno        [cg]o
SFX N_aj    io        igno
SFX N_aj     a        igno      [^cgi]a
SFX N_aj     a       higno        [cg]a
SFX N_aj    ia        igno
SFX N_aj     e        igno        [^i]e
SFX N_aj    ie        igno
SFX N_aj     i        igno
SFX N_aj     o         oso
SFX N_aj     a         oso
SFX N_aj     e         oso      [^cgh]e
SFX N_aj     e        ioso        [cg]e
SFX N_aj     i         oso      [^cgh]i
SFX N_aj     i        ioso        [cg]i
SFX N_aj     o         uto
SFX N_aj     a         uto
SFX N_aj     e         uto      [^cgh]e
SFX N_aj     e        iuto        [cg]e
SFX N_aj     i         uto      [^cgh]i
SFX N_aj     i        iuto        [cg]i
SFX N_aj      0        ano    [^aeiouy]
SFX N_aj      0       cano     [aeiou]c
SFX N_aj      0       gano     [aeiou]g
SFX N_aj      0       pano     [aeiou]p
SFX N_aj      0       tano     [aeiou]t
SFX N_aj     y        iano
SFX N_aj     o         ano
SFX N_aj     a         ano
SFX N_aj     e         ano      [^cgh]e
SFX N_aj     e        iano        [cg]e
SFX N_aj     i         ano      [^cgh]i
SFX N_aj     i        iano        [cg]i
SFX N_aj   ese        ense
SFX N_aj      0   eggiante  [^aeioucgy]
SFX N_aj      0  heggiante         [cg]
SFX N_aj      0 cheggiante     [aeiou]c
SFX N_aj      0 gheggiante     [aeiou]g
SFX N_aj      0  peggiante     [aeiou]p
SFX N_aj      0  teggiante     [aeiou]t
SFX N_aj     y   ieggiante
SFX N_aj     o    eggiante       [^cg]o
SFX N_aj     o   heggiante        [cg]o
SFX N_aj    io    eggiante       [cg]io
SFX N_aj     a    eggiante       [^cg]a
SFX N_aj     a   heggiante        [cg]a
SFX N_aj    ia    eggiante       [cg]ia
SFX N_aj     e    eggiante
SFX N_aj     i    eggiante
SFX N_v     0     are [^aeiouy]
SFX N_v     0    care  [aeiou]c
